Wyoming, session 2025, SF0143.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-4-801, 9-4-802, 9-4-803(a),
9-4-805, 9-4-806(a)(intro) and (b), 9-4-807, 9-4-809
through 9-4-812, 9-4-817(a), (c)(i), (d)(intro) and (ii)
and 9-4-818(a) are amended to read:
9-4-801. Board of deposits; creation; composition;
records; meetings; general duties.
The state loan and investment board is established as and
shall perform the duties of the board of deposits. The
governor is the chairman of the board and the state
treasurer is the secretary of the board for the purpose of
performing the duties of the board of deposits. The records
of the board of deposits kept by the secretary, or a duly
certified copy thereof, are prima facie evidence of any
action of the board. The board of deposits shall meet
quarterly each year, or at any other time, upon the call of
the chairman. The board shall designate banks or credit
unions within this state eligible as state depositories for
the purpose of receiving on deposit funds of this state.
9-4-802. Board of deposits; application; designation
of depositories; revocation of designation.
A bank or credit union applying to be a state depository
shall file a written application with the secretary of the
board of deposits. The application shall be accompanied by
a sworn statement of the financial condition of the bank or
credit union at the time the application is made and a
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0143
ENROLLED ACT NO. 28, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
certified resolution providing proper authority of the
depository. The secretary of the board of deposits shall
review all applications, prepare a recommendation regarding
each, and submit a list of all applicants and his
recommendations to the board. The secretary of the board
shall prepare a list of all financial institutions of the
state which are approved by the board to be depositories.
The chairman and the secretary of the board shall certify
the list to the bank collateral officer who is designated
by the state treasurer. Once the bank collateral officer
is designated, the state treasurer shall provide a written
order to the bank or credit union declaring it a state
depository until its authority is revoked by the board.
Each year, designated state depositories shall submit a
current statement of condition, a certified copy of a
resolution indicating its authority to act as a state
depository has not been revoked and any other information
the secretary of the board deems necessary. If, at any
time state funds are on deposit with a state depository, a
state depository is subject to any public enforcement
action by any federal or state regulatory entity, the state
depository shall notify the secretary of the board of the
regulatory action if the action is not confidential. The
board may revoke a bank's or credit union's designation as
a state depository at any time except that no time deposit,
open account shall be withdrawn from a state depository
prior to the date of maturity without providing forty-five
(45) days prior written notice, absent a default by the
state depository.
9-4-803. Deposit of state money in approved
depositories; authority of treasurer; rulemaking.
(a) The state treasurer may deposit any portion of
the public monies in his possession in any bank or credit
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0143
ENROLLED ACT NO. 28, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
union chartered under the laws of the United States or
under the law of any state if the bank or credit union is
conducting business in Wyoming and has been approved under
W.S. 9-4-801 through 9-4-818 by the board of deposits. As
used in W.S. 9-4-801 through 9-4-818, "bank" includes
federal and state savings and loan associations. Federal
and state savings and loan associations or credit unions
may be designated as depositories for state funds in the
same manner as state and national banks.
9-4-805. Deposit of state money in approved
depositories; other acceptable security.
Instead of furnishing a surety bond as security for the
deposits, a depository may pledge any bonds, debentures and
other securities in which the state treasurer may by law
invest and in an amount equal, at least, to the maximum
amount of money at any time to be deposited with the bank
or credit union. The bonds, debentures and other securities
so pledged shall have a market value at least equal to the
amount of the deposit. In addition, any depository may
furnish as security for the deposit letters of credit
issued by any Federal Home Loan Bank in such form as
approved by the state treasurer of Wyoming or pledge
conventional first mortgages of Wyoming real estate and
notes connected with the mortgages at a ratio of one and
one-half to one (1.5:1) of the value of public funds
secured by them. A pledge of collateral as security for
the deposit of public funds shall be accompanied by a
written assignment from the depository vesting legal title
thereto to the state and by any other instruments required
by the state treasurer. The assignment shall provide that
the depository shall pay over deposited public funds and
accrued interest thereon to the state treasurer, or his
authorized deputy, upon check, order or demand in
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0143
ENROLLED ACT NO. 28, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
accordance with this article. The assignment shall also
provide that the state has the authority, if the depository
defaults, to sell all collateral necessary to realize the
full amount of deposited public funds and interest accrued
thereon. The interest on bonds, debentures and other
securities, so pledged, when paid shall be remitted to the
bank or credit union so pledging them, as long as it is not
in default.
9-4-806. Deposit of state money in approved
depositories; bank resolution.
(a) Every bank or credit union designated as a
depository for funds of the state of Wyoming or any
political subdivision thereof shall furnish to the
treasurer of the state of Wyoming, or treasurer of the
appropriate political subdivision, a certified copy of the
resolution adopted by its board of directors which shall be
in:
(b) The certified copy required by subsection (a) of
this section shall be provided at the time of the bank's or
credit union's application or within thirty (30) days
following the designation by the state board of deposits or
proper governing board, as directed by the state treasurer
or treasurer of the appropriate political subdivision.
9-4-807. Deposit of state money in approved
depositories; federal insurance; security for deposits not
covered.
Any properly designated depository of the public funds of
the state, or of any political subdivision thereof, which
is entitled to the benefits of deposit insurance provided
for by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0143
ENROLLED ACT NO. 28, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
national credit union share insurance fund, if applicable,
and the acts of congress relating thereto, shall give and
at all times maintain security for the prompt payment and
the safekeeping of the whole amount of any such deposit.
The deposit insurance provided by the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation or the national credit union share
insurance fund, if applicable, is eligible as the security
required for the portion of any deposit that is insured by
the corporation, and constitutes all of the security
required for the portion. Any portion of the deposit as is
not so insured shall be secured by depository bond or
approved collateral securities as required by law.
9-4-809. "Time deposit, open account"; definition.
As used in W.S. 9-4-809 through 9-4-812 and 9-4-817 "time
deposit, open account" means a deposit, other than a "time
certificate of deposit" or a "savings deposit", with
respect to which "time deposit, open account" there is in
force a written contract between the depositor and the
depository bank or credit union that neither the whole or
any part of the deposit may be withdrawn by the depositor,
by check or otherwise, prior to the date of maturity or
returned to the depositor by the depository, prior to the
date of maturity, without written notice given not less
than forty-five (45) days in advance of withdrawals or
returns.
9-4-810. "Time deposit, open account"; rate of
interest on public funds.
Quarterly each year, taking into consideration all
information before it, the board of deposits shall fix the
minimum rate of interest to be paid on time deposit, open
account. Time deposits shall be at the minimum rate of
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0143
ENROLLED ACT NO. 28, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
interest as fixed by the board or at such higher rate as
agreed to by the depository bank or credit union. The
minimum rate shall go into effect on the first day of
April, July, October and January following as the case may
be, and the rate shall not be changed for three (3) months.
9-4-811. "Time deposit, open account"; payment of
interest; accounts of monies.
Interest paid by banks or credit unions on public funds on
time deposit, open account shall be paid to the state
treasurer quarterly on the first business day of January,
April, July and October as required by the state treasurer.
The state treasurer shall require, and every depository
shall keep accurate accounts of all monies deposited with
it, showing the amounts deposited and when deposited.
9-4-812. Withdrawals of state funds; liability of
treasurer for money or bond loss.
The state treasurer or his authorized deputy may withdraw
any and all funds deposited for the purpose of paying the
appropriations and obligations of the state as lawfully
required or whenever he deems it advisable or to the
interests of the state to do so except funds deposited as
time deposit, open account shall require notice in advance
of withdrawal as specified in W.S. 9-4-809. The state
treasurer and his sureties are responsible for the faithful
performance of the duties of the treasurer under the law,
and for a proper accounting and turning over to his
successor of all monies paid to the treasurer as such but
he shall not be held personally liable for any monies that
may be lost by reason of the failure or insolvency of any
bank or credit union selected as a state depository nor for
the deficiency or loss upon any surety bond or securities
6

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0143
ENROLLED ACT NO. 28, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
deposited by any bank or credit union, if the surety bond
or securities were placed according to law, unless the loss
could have been avoided by the exercise of reasonable care
and diligence on the part of the treasurer or his deputy,
in which case the treasurer is liable to the state for the
loss.
9-4-817. Deposits by political subdivisions; selected
institutions; security; withdrawals.
(a) To the extent they are not otherwise invested,
the monies collected and held by a treasurer of a political
subdivision, municipality or special district within this
state shall be deposited in banks or credit unions which
qualify as depositories for public monies as specified in
W.S. 9-4-803(a).
(c) The deposits made pursuant to this section shall
be made to the extent that they are:
(i) Fully insured by the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation or the national credit union share
insurance fund, whichever is applicable; or
(d) Any bank, savings and loan association, or
federal savings bank or credit union, located in the state,
may apply to keep the monies upon the following conditions:
(ii) All funds deposited in a savings deposit
account shall be withdrawable upon demand provided that the
bank, or savings and loan association or credit union may
at any time require giving of notice in writing of an
intended withdrawal of thirty (30) days before a withdrawal
is made;
7

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0143
ENROLLED ACT NO. 28, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
9-4-818. Deposits by political subdivisions;
applications by, and approval of, banks; rate of interest;
defaults.
(a) Applications by banks, and savings and loan
associations or credit unions shall be submitted to the
proper governing board and shall be acted upon by the
proper governing board as soon thereafter as practicable.
Prior to the deposit, the board shall negotiate the rate of
interest applicable to the deposit. No monies shall be
deposited by any treasurer except in banks, and savings and
loan associations or credit unions which have been approved
by the proper governing board.
8

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0143
ENROLLED ACT NO. 28, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
9